Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1505
Construction, leasing, improvement, maintenance, and management; annual tax; election not required.

For the purpose of the construction, leasing, improvement, maintenance, and management of an aviation field and for the payment of persons employed in the performance of labor in connection therewith, any city or village may, without a vote of the legal electors, levy an annual tax of not to exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such city or village. No part of the funds so levied and collected shall be used for any other purpose.

Laws 1943, c. 39, § 1(5), p. 183;

R.S.1943, § 19-803.02;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 34, p. 950;

Laws 1955, c. 51, § 1, p. 171;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 78;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 78.

Airport Authority Act did not amend this section as it was an independent act dealing with a different subject. Obitz v. Airport Authority of City of Red Cloud, 181 Neb. 410, 149 N.W.2d 105 (1967).